Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-711
State wayside areas; requirements.

State wayside areas shall be areas appropriate in size and located at strategic intervals adjacent to main traveled highways to provide safe rest and picnic stops for travelers, which sites shall be selected for scenic or historical interest when possible, equipped with safe approach and departure lanes, and be developed in a manner and with such facilities as are appropriate to their purpose, including overnight camping.

Laws 1983, LB 610, § 6.